Hawaii statutes.
§249-16 Duplicate bicycle tag; duplicate
moped license plate and tag; and duplicate certificates of registration. [Section
effective January 1, 2017. For section effective until December 31, 2016, see
main volume.] In the event that a bicycle tag or certificate of
registration furnished under section 249-14 or 249-14.2 or moped license plate,
tag, or certificate of registration furnished under section 249-14.1 is lost,
stolen, or mutilated, or becomes illegible, the person to whom it was furnished
may obtain a duplicate thereof by presenting to the county director of finance
the number and registration of the bicycle or moped involved. There shall be a
charge of $2 for the duplicate tag, a fee as determined by the county director
of finance for the duplicate license plate, and $5 for the duplicate
certificate of registration. [L 1953, c 8, §1; RL 1955, §130-14; HRS §249-16;
am L 1978, c 175, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 264, §5; am L 1998, c 188, §4;
am L 2016, c 200, §5]

§249-16 Duplicate bicycle and moped tags
and certificates of registration. In the event that a bicycle or moped
tag or certificate of registration furnished under section 249-14 or 249-14.2
is lost, stolen, or mutilated, or becomes illegible, the person to whom it was
furnished may obtain a duplicate thereof by presenting to the county director
of finance the number and registration of the bicycle or moped involved. There
shall be a charge of $2 for the duplicate tag and $5 for the duplicate
certificate of registration. [L 1953, c 8, §1; RL 1955, §130-14; HRS §249-16;
am L 1978, c 175, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 264, §5; am L 1998, c 188, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next